Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201852-2107
Priority of liens.

(1) Recorded liens,
mortgages, trust deeds, and other encumbrances on commercial real estate,
including a recorded lien securing revolving credit and future advances for
a loan, recorded before the date the commercial real estate broker's lien
is recorded, shall have priority over the commercial real estate broker's
lien.

(2) A construction
lien claim that is recorded after the commercial real estate broker's notice
of lien but that relates back to a date prior to the recording date of the
commercial real estate broker's notice of lien has priority over the commercial
real estate broker's lien.

(3) A purchase-money lien executed by the buyer of commercial real
estate in connection with a loan for which any part of the proceeds are used
to pay the purchase price of the commercial real estate has priority over
a commercial real estate broker's lien claimed for the commission owed by
the buyer against the commercial real estate purchased by the buyer.

Laws 2013, LB3, § 13.